District of Columbia statutes.
22-1709

Repealed

Bucketing, and bucket-shopping and bucket-shops; definitions.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 869a
Mar. 1, 1909, 35 Stat. 670, ch. 233
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 2(m), 41 DCR 1639
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(g), 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 22-1509.
1973 Ed., § 22-1509.
Effect of state law prohibiting or regulating operation of bucket-shops: Section 4 of the Act of October 13, 1982, Pub. L. 97-303 provided that no state law which prohibits or regulates the operation of “bucket-shops” or other similar or related activities shall invalidate any put, call, straddle, option, privilege, or other security, or apply to any activity which is incidental or related to the offer, purchase, sale, exercise, settlement, or closeout of any such instrument, if such instrument is traded pursuant to rules and regulations to a self-regulatory organization that are filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to § 19(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.